Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 8 County Superintendent of Schools

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Education Code of 1969,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1970).

§ 21-8-101.
Office abolished.

The office of county superintendent of schools is hereby abolished in every county of this state.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 176; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-176.

§ 21-8-102.
Transfer of duties; incumbents may serve out terms.

When the present term of the county superintendent of schools has expired the fiscal duties assigned by law to the county superintendent shall be discharged by the county treasurer, who shall receive no extra pay for the performance of such duties. All duties other than fiscal duties shall be discharged by the clerk of each district board of trustees, who shall receive no further compensation; provided, that any incumbent may serve out his term without reduction in compensation.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 177; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-177.